Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 3541.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Secretary” where no other department is referenced means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets and includes his or her designee.

“Domestic animal” means those animals defined by

6 V.S.A. § 1151(2)

.

“Domestic pet” or “pet” means any domestic dogs, domestic cats, and ferrets. The term shall also include such other domestic animals as the Secretary shall establish by rule, provided that the Secretary finds that the animal has the potential to become an imminent danger to public health or welfare if not subjected to the provisions of this chapter.

“Ferret” means only the European ferret (Mustela putorious furo).

“Legislative body” means the legislative body of a town, city, or incorporated village.

“Owner” means any person who owns a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid and includes any person who has actual or constructive possession of the pet or wolf-hybrid. The term also includes those persons who provide feed or shelter to a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid.

“Respondent” means a person alleged to have violated any provision of this chapter.

“Wolf-hybrid” means an animal that is the progeny or descendant of a domestic dog (Canis familiaris) and a wolf (Canis lupus or Canis rufus). “Wolf-hybrid” also means an animal that is advertised, registered, licensed, or otherwise described or represented as a wolf-hybrid by its owner or an animal that exhibits primary physical and behavioral wolf characteristics. The Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife shall adopt a rule describing primary physical and behavioral wolf characteristics.

“Working farm dog” means a dog that is bred or trained to herd or protect livestock or poultry or to protect crops and that is used for those purposes and that is registered as a working farm dog pursuant to subsection 3581(a) of this title.

“Pet dealer” means any person who sells or exchanges or who offers to sell or exchange cats, dogs, or wolf-hybrids, or any combination thereof, from three or more litters of cats, dogs, or wolf-hybrids in any 12-month period. This definition shall not apply to pet shops, animal shelters, or rescue organizations as those terms are defined in section 3901 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 15, 1994; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2009, No. 48

, § 7, eff. May 28, 2009;

2013, No. 30

, § 1.

§ 3541a.
Feral animals; responsibility.

It is not the intent of the General Assembly to require a person to be responsible under this chapter for a feral animal that takes up residence in a building other than the person’s home, even if the person occasionally provides feed to the animal.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 30

, § 2.

§§ 3542-3544.
Repealed.
1977, No. 215 (Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. April 12, 1978.

§ 3545.
Right to kill domestic pets or wolf-hybrids generally.

A person may kill a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid that suddenly assaults him or her or when necessary to discontinue an attack upon the person, or another person, provided that the attack or assault does not occur while the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid is restrained, within an enclosure containing the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid, or on the premises of the owner.

A domestic pet or wolf-hybrid found wounding, killing, or worrying another domestic pet or wolf-hybrid, a domestic animal, or fowl may be killed when the attendant circumstances are such that the killing is reasonably necessary to prevent injury to the animal or fowl that is the subject of the attack.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 12, 1978;

1979, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 28, 1980;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 15, 1994.

§ 3546.
Investigation of vicious domestic pets or wolf-hybrids; order.

When a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid has bitten a person while the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid is off the premises of the owner or keeper, and the person bitten requires medical attention for the attack, the person may file a written complaint with the legislative body of the municipality. The complaint shall contain the time, date, and place where the attack occurred, the name and address of the victim or victims, and any other facts that may assist the legislative body in conducting its investigation required by subsection (b) of this section.

The legislative body, within seven days from receipt of the complaint, shall investigate the charges and hold a hearing on the matter. If the owner of the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid that is the subject of the complaint can be ascertained with due diligence, the owner shall be provided with a written notice of the time, date, and place of hearing and the facts of the complaint.

If the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid is found to have bitten the victim without provocation, the municipal officials shall make such order for the protection of persons as the facts and circumstances of the case may require, including that the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid is disposed of in a humane way, muzzled, chained, or confined. The order shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested. A person who, after receiving notice, fails to comply with the terms of the order shall be subject to the penalties provided in section 3550 of this chapter.

The procedures provided in this section shall apply if the domestic pet or wolf-hybrid is not a rabies suspect. If a member of the legislative body or a municipal official designated by the legislative body determines that the animal is a rabies suspect, the provisions of subchapter 5 of this chapter and the rules of the Department of Health shall apply.

The procedures provided in this section shall not apply if the voters of a municipality, at a special or annual meeting duly warned for the purpose, have authorized the legislative body of the municipality to regulate domestic pets or wolf-hybrids by ordinances that are inconsistent with this section, in which case those ordinances shall apply.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 12, 1978;

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 15, 1994;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2021, No. 20

, § 197.

§ 3547.
Repealed.
1977, No. 215 (Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. April 12, 1978.

§ 3548.
Application to unorganized towns and gores; supervisors.

The provisions of subchapters 1, 2, 4, and 5 of this chapter shall apply to unorganized towns and gores, and the duties imposed upon municipal clerks by this chapter shall, in unorganized towns and gores, be performed by the supervisors thereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. June 15, 1994.

§ 3549.
Domestic pets or wolf-hybrids; regulation by towns.

The legislative body of a city or town by ordinance may regulate the licensing, keeping, leashing, muzzling, restraint, impoundment, and destruction of domestic pets or wolf-hybrids and their running at large, except that a legislative body of a city or town shall not prohibit or regulate the barking or running at large of a working farm dog when it is on the property being farmed by the person who registered the working farm dog, pursuant to subsection 3581(a) of this title, in the following circumstances:

if the working farm dog is barking in order to herd or protect livestock or poultry or to protect crops; or

if the working farm dog is running at large in order to herd or protect livestock or poultry or to protect crops.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 300

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 20, 1968; amended

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 15, 1994;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2009, No. 48

, § 8, eff. May 28, 2009;

2013, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 3550.
Penalties; enforcement; municipal legislative body; Secretary.

A municipal legislative body or an officer designated by the Secretary may impose a civil penalty of up to $500.00 per violation in accordance with the provisions of this section.

A municipal legislative body may impose penalties for violation of any provisions of subchapter 1 or 2, refusal to obtain a pet dealer permit under subchapter 3, or a refusal to comply with an order issued by a municipal officer under subchapter 5 of this chapter.

An officer designated by the Secretary may impose penalties for violation of a rule adopted by a State agency under subchapter 5 of this chapter, violation of a quarantine order issued under subchapter 5 of this chapter, or refusal to comply with an order issued by a State officer under subchapter 5 of this chapter.

In determining the amount of the civil penalty to be ordered, the legislative body or officer shall consider the following:

the degree of actual or potential impact on public health, safety, and welfare resulting from the violation;

whether the respondent has cured the violation;

the presence of mitigating circumstances;

whether the respondent knew or had reason to know the violation existed;

the respondent’s record of compliance;

the deterrent effect of the penalty;

the costs of enforcement; and

the length of time the violation has existed.

When the legislative body or officer has reasonable grounds to believe that a person has violated a provision of this chapter under its purview, the legislative body or officer may issue a notice of the alleged violation, which shall be delivered to the respondent in person or mailed to the respondent by registered mail. The notice of violation shall include:

a civil penalty of up to $500.00;

a brief description of the alleged violation and identification of the law alleged to have been violated;

a statement that the respondent has a right to a hearing before the legislative body or a hearing officer designated by the Secretary at no cost to the respondent, a description of the procedures for requesting a hearing, and a statement that failure to request a hearing within 21 days of the date of mailing of the notice shall result in a final decision with no right of appeal; and

if applicable, a directive that the respondent take actions necessary to achieve compliance with the law.

A person who receives a notice of violation shall be offered an opportunity for a hearing before the legislative body or hearing officer, provided that the request for hearing is made in writing to the clerk of the municipality or the Secretary within 21 days after the date of mailing of the notice of violation. If the respondent does not request a hearing in a timely fashion, the decision shall be final and the penalty shall be payable within 35 days following mailing of the notice of violation. If the respondent does make a timely request for a hearing, the legislative body or hearing officer shall hold a hearing within 14 days of receipt of the request. After the hearing, the legislative body or hearing officer may affirm, reduce, or eliminate the penalty. The decision shall be delivered or mailed to the respondent in the same manner as the notice of violation and shall be effective five days following mailing of the decision or immediately following delivery of the decision.

Imposition of a penalty under this subchapter precludes imposition of any other administrative or civil penalty under any other provision of law for the same violation.

The civil penalty shall be paid to the enforcing agency or enforcing legislative body. If the respondent fails to pay the penalty within the time prescribed, the legislative body or Secretary may bring a collection action, including a small claims action, in the Civil Division of the Superior Court.

A respondent aggrieved by a decision made following a hearing before the legislative body or hearing officer may appeal within 30 days of receipt of the decision to the Civil Division of the Superior Court, which shall consider the matter de novo.

On application of a municipality or the Secretary, the Civil Division of the Superior Court shall have jurisdiction to enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter. The Court may also authorize the seizure and disposition of domestic pets or wolf-hybrids when owners refuse to have the pets or wolf-hybrids inoculated or licensed, or when the Court determines that there is a threat to the public welfare.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. June 15, 1994; amended

2013, No. 30

, § 3;

2015, No. 23

, § 147;

2021, No. 20

, § 198.

§ 3551.
Search warrants.

An officer who has attempted to seize a domestic pet or wolf-hybrid under sections 3546, 3549, 3624, 3745, 3806, or 3807 of this chapter and has not been permitted to search for or take the animal, may apply to a judicial officer authorized to issue search warrants for a warrant to search the properties of the owner of the animal or any other property if the officer has reasonable cause to believe that the animal may be on it. If the judicial officer is satisfied that there is a reasonable cause to believe that the animal is on a property, the judicial officer shall issue a search warrant authorizing a law enforcement officer of the State of Vermont to search the property and premises for the animal within a specified period of time not to exceed 10 days and to seize the animal. The warrant shall be served between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. unless the warrant directs that it may be served at any time. The judicial officer may, by appropriate provision in the warrant, and for reasonable cause shown, authorize its execution at other times. The warrant shall designate the court to which it shall be returned.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. June 15, 1994.